Maryland, session 2025, HB1197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–324.
(a) This section applies only in Frederick County.
(b) (1) The SALARY FOR THE Sheriff of Frederick County [shall receive an
annual salary of $125,000] IS EQUAL TO THE SALARY OF A DEPARTMENT OF STATE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1197*

HOUSE BILL 1197
POLICE LIEUTENANT COLONEL, AT THE HIGHEST AVAILABLE STEP FOR A
LIEUTENANT COLONEL UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE PAY PLAN IN
EFFECT ON THE DAY PRIOR TO THE DAY THAT THE SHERIFF BEGINS A TERM OF
OFFICE.
(2) ANY CHANGE IN THE SALARY PAID UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF
STATE POLICE PAY PLAN DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE OF THE SHERIFF MAY NOT
APPLY TO THE INCUMBENT SHERIFF, BUT THE CHANGED RATE SHALL TAKE EFFECT
AT THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT FOLLOWING TERM OF OFFICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County while serving in a term of
office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act
concerning the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County shall take effect
at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an
individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired
term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.